District of Columbia statutes.
5-441

Fire and Emergency Medical Services education and training program; certification of firefighters, paramedics, and emergency medical technicians.

(a)

The Chief of the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department shall design an education and training program that encompasses entry-level and in-service training and addresses issues such as skills with specialized equipment acquired to address special hazards, knowledge of new construction techniques, and emergency medicine skills for target audiences, such as persons with disabilities, the elderly, and very young. The education and training program shall be based upon the department’s mission and operational performance measures.

(b)

The Fire Chief, in close coordination with the Medical Director, shall develop and implement a program of certification for firefighters, paramedics, and emergency medical technicians.

(c)

For fiscal years 2011, 2012, 2013, and 2014, no officer or member of the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department shall be detailed to Emergency Medical Technician classes for more than 60 days.

Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-194, § 202, 51 DCR 9406
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 17, 53 DCR 6198
Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-147, § 5, 55 DCR 2558
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 3024, 57 DCR 6242
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 3014, 58 DCR 6226
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 3024, 59 DCR 8025
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 3054, 60 DCR 12472
D.C. Law 16-305, in subsec. (a), substituted “persons with disabilities, the” for “the disabled”.
D.C. Law 17-147 inserted “, in close coordination with the Medical Director,” following “Fire Chief”.
D.C. Law 18-223 added subsec. (c).
D.C. Law 19-21, in subsec. (c), substituted “fiscal years 2011 and 2012” for “fiscal year 2011”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 substituted “fiscal years 2011, 2012, and 2013” for “fiscal years 2011 and 2012” in (c).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 substituted “2012, 2013, and 2014” for “2012, and 2013” in (c).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3024 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3064 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 3054 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.